Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Penalties

39A.990.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter or any administrative regulation or order promulgated pursuant to this chapter for which another penalty is not specified shall be fined an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for a first offense and not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each subsequent offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 226, § 27, effective July 15, 1998; 2021 ch. 6, § 6, effective February 2, 2021.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Sentence of imprisonment for misdemeanor, KRS

532.090

.